Washington statutes.
RCW 18.57.245

Insurer's report of malpractice payments.

Every institution or organization providing professional liability insurance to osteopathic physicians shall send a complete report to the board of all malpractice settlements, awards, or payments in excess of twenty thousand dollars as a result of a claim or action for damages alleged to have been caused by an insured physician's incompetency or negligence in the practice of osteopathic medicine. Such institution or organization shall also report the award, settlement, or payment of three or more claims during a year as the result of the alleged physician's incompetence or negligence in the practice of medicine regardless of the dollar amount of the award or payment.

Reports required by this section shall be made within sixty days of the date of the settlement or verdict. Failure to comply with this section is punishable by a civil penalty not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars.

[ 1986 c 300 s 10.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—1986 c 300: "(1) The legislature finds that medical malpractice will be reduced if hospitals establish coordinated medical malpractice prevention programs and provide greater scrutiny of physicians prior to granting or renewing hospital privileges.

(2) The legislature also finds that physician disciplinary boards can reduce medical malpractice if they have access to additional information on health care providers who are incompetent or impaired." [ 1986 c 300 s 1.]

Severability—1986 c 300: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1986 c 300 s 12.]